Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.122

Measurement of commodities—Public policy.

Because of the widespread importance to the marketing of goods, raw materials, and agricultural products such as, but not limited to, grains, timber, logs, wood chips, scrap metal, oil, gas, petroleum products, coal, fish and other commodities, that qualitative and quantitative measurements of such goods, materials and products be accurately and honestly made, it is declared to be the public policy of this state that certain conduct with respect to said measurement be declared unlawful.

[ 1967 c 200 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 c 200: "If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable." [ 1967 c 200 s 13.]

Weights and measures: Chapter 19.94 RCW.